Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Chapter 31. Mississippi Registration of Foreign Limited Liability Partnerships Act
[Repealed]

§§79-31-1 through79-31-39.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1995, ch. 353, § 25, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

§79-31-1. [Laws, 1994, ch. 390, § 1]

§79-31-3. [Laws, 1994, ch. 390, § 2]

§79-31-5. [Laws, 1994, ch. 390, § 3]

§79-31-7. [Laws, 1994, ch. 390, § 4]

§79-31-9. [Laws, 1994, ch. 390, § 5]

§79-31-11. [Laws, 1994, ch. 390, § 6]

§79-31-13. [Laws, 1994, ch. 390, § 7]

§79-31-15. [Laws, 1994, ch. 390, § 8]

§79-31-17. [Laws, 1994, ch. 390, § 9]

§79-31-19. [Laws, 1994, ch. 390, § 10]

§79-31-21. [Laws, 1994, ch. 390, § 11]

§79-31-23. [Laws, 1994, ch. 390, § 12]

§79-31-25. [Laws, 1994, ch. 390, § 13]

§79-31-27. [Laws, 1994, ch. 390, § 14]

§79-31-29. [Laws, 1994, ch. 390, § 15]

§79-31-31. [Laws, 1994, ch. 390, § 16]

§79-31-33. [Laws, 1994, ch. 390, § 17]

§79-31-35. [Laws, 1994, ch. 390, § 18]

§79-31-37. [Laws, 1994, ch. 390, § 19]

§79-31-39. [Laws, 1994, ch. 390, § 20]

Former § 79-31-1 was entitled: Short title. For current provisions relating to foreign limited liability partnerships, see §§ 79-13-1101 et seq.

Former § 79-31-3 was entitled: Amendment and repeal of provisions of chapter. For current provisions relating to foreign limited liability partnerships, see §§ 79-13-1101 et seq.

Former § 79-31-5 was entitled: Definitions. For current provisions relating to foreign limited liability partnerships, see §§ 79-13-1101 et seq.

Former § 79-31-7 was entitled: Which law shall govern; liability of partners; difference in laws not grounds to deny registration. For current provisions relating to foreign limited liability partnerships, see §§ 79-13-1101 et seq.

Former § 79-31-9 was entitled: Registration. For current provisions relating to foreign limited liability partnerships, see §§ 79-13-1101 et seq.

Former § 79-31-11 was entitled: Filing of application. For current provisions relating to foreign limited liability partnerships, see §§ 79-13-1101 et seq.

Former § 79-31-13 was entitled: Name of partnership; required language; prohibited words. For current provisions relating to foreign limited liability partnerships, see §§ 79-13-1101 et seq.

Former § 79-31-15 was entitled: Correction of application. For current provisions relating to foreign limited liability partnerships, see §§ 79-13-1101 et seq.

Former § 79-31-17 was entitled: Cancellation of registration. For current provisions relating to foreign limited liability partnerships, see §§ 79-13-1101 et seq.

Former § 79-31-19 was entitled: Effect of failure to register. For current provisions relating to foreign limited liability partnerships, see §§ 79-13-1101 et seq.

Former § 79-31-21 was entitled: Activities of partnership not constituting transacting business in state; exceptions. For current provisions relating to foreign limited liability partnerships, see §§ 79-13-1101 et seq.

Former § 79-31-23 was entitled: Attorney General may restrict transactions in violation of chapter. For current provisions relating to foreign limited liability partnerships, see §§ 79-13-1101 et seq.

Former § 79-31-25 was entitled: Penalty for signing false document. For current provisions relating to foreign limited liability partnerships, see §§ 79-13-1101 et seq.

Former § 79-31-27 was entitled: Agent for service of process on partnership. For current provisions relating to foreign limited liability partnerships, see §§ 79-13-1101 et seq.

Former § 79-31-29 was entitled: Permissible activities of partnership. For current provisions relating to foreign limited liability partnerships, see §§ 79-13-1101 et seq.

Former § 79-31-31 was entitled: Construction of terms and provisions of chapter. For current provisions relating to foreign limited liability partnerships, see §§ 79-13-1101 et seq.

Former § 79-31-33 was entitled: Fees. For current provisions relating to foreign limited liability partnerships, see §§ 79-13-1101 et seq.

Former § 79-31-35 was entitled: Powers of Secretary of State to implement chapter. For current provisions relating to foreign limited liability partnerships, see §§ 79-13-1101 et seq.

Former § 79-31-37 was entitled: Tax classification of partnerships. For current provisions relating to foreign limited liability partnerships, see §§ 79-13-1101 et seq.

Former § 79-31-39 was entitled: Severability of provisions of chapter. For current provisions relating to foreign limited liability partnerships, see §§ 79-13-1101 et seq.